tur-verb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V
+Active
+Passive
+Base
+Positive
+Negative
+Aorist
+Past
+PastP
+Future
+Continuous
+Must
+Desire
+Condition
+Possibility
+Imperative
+1person
+2person
+3person
+1personPl
+2personPl
+3personPl

LEXICON Root

Verb;

LEXICON Verb

git     Vtran1;
süz     Vtran1;
gör     Vtran1;
konuş   Vtran1;
sat     Vtran1;
yap     Vtran1;
aç      Vtran1;
et      Vtran1;
kapat   Vtran1;
öl      Vtran2;
kapa    Vtran2;
oku     Vtran2;
ulu     Vtran2;
eyle    Vtran2;
ağla    Vtran2;
atla    Vtran2;
gül     Vtran2;
uyu     Vtran2;
kıl     Vtran2;
gel     Vint;
kaybol  Vint;
varol   Vint;
büyü    Vint;
kaç     Vint;
yaşlan  Vint;
doğ     Vint;
koş     Vint;
yüz     Vint;
ayrıl   Vint;
yürü    Vint;
ol      Vint;

LEXICON Vtran1

+V:0    Voice1;

LEXICON Vtran2

+V:0    Voice2;

LEXICON Vint

+V:0    Voice3;

LEXICON Voice1

+Active:0       Negation;
+Passive:^Hl    Negation;
+Base:^mAk      #;

LEXICON Voice2

+Active:0       Negation;
+Passive:^Hn    Negation;
+Base:^mAk      #;

LEXICON Voice3

+Active:0       Negation;
+Base:^mAk      #;

LEXICON Negation

+Positive:0            TensePos;
+Negative:^mA          TenseNeg;

LEXICON TensePos

+Aorist:^Hr           Person;
+Past:^DH             PersonPast;
+PastP:^mHş           Person;
+Future:^YAcAk        Person;
+Continuous:^Hyor     Person;
+Continuous:^mAktAY	  Person;
+Must:^mAlI           Person;
+Desire:^YA           PersonPast;
+Condition:^sA        PersonPast;
+Imperative:0         PersonImp;

LEXICON TensePos

+Aorist:^Hr           ComTense1;
+PastP:^mHş           ComTense1;
+Future:^YAcAk        ComTense1;
+Continuous:^Hyor     ComTense1;
+Continuous:^mAktAY	  ComTense1;
+Must:^mAlIy          ComTense1;
+Past:^DHy            ComTense2;
+Condition:^sAy       ComTense3;
+Possibility:^YAbil   ComTense4;

LEXICON TenseNeg

+Aorist:^Z            PersonAor;
+Past:^DH             PersonPast;
+PastP:^mHş           Person;
+Future:^YAcAk        Person;
+Continuous:^Hyor     Person;
+Continuous:^mAktAY	  Person;
+Must:^mAlI           Person;
+Desire:^YA           PersonPast;
+Condition:^sA        PersonPast;
+Imperative:0         PersonImp;

LEXICON TenseNeg

+Aorist:^Z            ComTense1;
+PastP:^mHş           ComTense1;
+Future:^YAcAk        ComTense1;
+Continuous:^Hyor     ComTense1;
+Continuous:^mAktAY	  ComTense1;
+Must:^mAlIy          ComTense1;
+Past:^DHy            ComTense2;
+Condition:^sAy       ComTense3;
+Possibility:^YAbil   ComTense4;

LEXICON ComTense1

+Past:^DH       PersonPast;
+PastP:^mHş     Person;
+Condition:^sA  PersonPast;

LEXICON ComTense2

+Past:^DH       PersonPast;
+Condition:^sA  PersonPast;

LEXICON ComTense3

+Past:^DH       PersonPast;
+PastP:^mHş     Person;

LEXICON ComTense4

+Aorist:^Hr           Person;
+Past:^DH             PersonPast;
+PastP:^mHş           Person;
+Future:^AcAk         Person;
+Continuous:^Hyor     Person;
+Continuous:^mAktAY	  Person;
+Must:^mAlI           Person;
+Condition:^sA        PersonPast;

LEXICON Person

+1person:^Hm         #;
+2person:^SHn        #;
+3person:0           #;
+1personPl:^YHz      #;
+2personPl:^SHnHz    #;
+3personPl:0         #;
+3personPl:^lAr      #;

LEXICON PersonImp

+2person:0         #;
+2personPl:^YHn    #;
+2personPl:^YHnHz  #;
+3person:^sHn      #;
+3personPl:^sHnlAr #;

LEXICON PersonAor

1person:^m         #;     
2person:^sIn       #;
3person:0          #;
1personPl:^Iz      #;
2personPl:^sInIz   #;
3personPl:0        #;
3personPl:^lAr     #;

LEXICON PersonPast

+1person:^m        #;
+2person:^n        #;
+3person:0         #;
+1personPl:^k      #;
+2personPl:^HnHz   #;
+3personPl:0       #;
+3personPl:^lAr    #;
